Washington statutes.
RCW 41.56.024

Application of chapter to classified employees of technical colleges.

In addition to the entities listed in RCW 41.56.020, this chapter shall apply to classified employees of technical colleges as provided for in RCW 28B.50.874.

[ 1991 c 238 s 112.]